Missouri, session 2026, HB3514.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 229, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 229.224, to read as follows:
229.224. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, prior to
constructing a roundabout on any federal highway or numbered state highway or state
route within any county, city, town, or village, the department of transportation shall
obtain the consent of the governing body of such county, city, town, or village. The
county, city, town, or village shall report to the department its decision on a request
within thirty days of the department's request for consent to begin work on a project.
For purposes of this section, "roundabout" means a road junction at which traffic
moves in one direction around a central island to reach one of the roads converging in it.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.